Utah statutes.
63G-6-506.5.   Interest rate for bond claim.

Unless otherwise specified in a lawful contract between a public procurement unit and the person making a bond claim against the public procurement unit, the interest rate applicable to the bond claim is the rate described in Subsection 15-1-1(2).



Enacted by Chapter 330, 2012 General Session

